Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-402.03
Shoplifters; arrest; merchant or employee not liable.

A merchant or a merchant's employee who causes the arrest of a person, as provided for in section 29-402.01, for larceny of goods held for sale shall not be criminally or civilly liable for slander, libel, false arrest, or false imprisonment where the merchant or merchant's employee has probable cause for believing that the person arrested committed larceny of goods held for sale.

Laws 1957, c. 101, § 3, p. 361;

Laws 1963, c. 157, § 2, p. 557.

Instruction defining arrest in almost verbatim language of 5 Am. Jur. 2d, Arrest, was proper. Schmidt v. Richman Gordman, Inc., 191 Neb. 345, 215 N.W.2d 105 (1974).